Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.0925

Business assistance center—Minority and women business development office.

There is established within the department's *business assistance center the minority and women business development office. This office shall provide business-related assistance to minorities and women as well as serve as an outreach program to increase minority and women-owned businesses' awareness and use of existing business assistance services.

[ 1993 c 512 s 7.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The business assistance center and its powers and duties were terminated June 30, 1995. RCW 43.31.083, 43.31.085, 43.31.087, and 43.31.089 were repealed by 1993 c 280 s 81, effective June 30, 1996.